District of Columbia statutes.
32-752

Establishment and administration of the Job Opportunity Bank.

(a)

There is established a Job Opportunity Bank for the purpose of providing grants and other forms of financial assistance to increase job opportunities for low-income District residents to upgrade their job skills and provide customized skills training for new and incumbent workers employed by District employers.

(b)

The Job Opportunity Bank shall be subject to the general policy guidance and direction of the Workforce Investment Council.

(c)

The Workforce Investment Council shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Mayor and the Director in matters pertaining to the operation and administration of the Job Opportunity Bank.

(d)

The Job Opportunity Bank shall be funded by annual appropriations.

(e)

The funds shall be administered by the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development.

(f)

The Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development may fund applications for grants or other assistance as may be recommended by the Director under the provisions of this chapter.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 203, 53 DCR 2602
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2192, 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 318(b), 56 DCR 1117
This section is referenced in § 1-328.05.
D.C. Law 16-192 rewrote subsecs. (e) and (f).
D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (f), substituted “The” for “Subject to the availability of funds, the”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2192 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2192 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2192 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
Short title: Section 2191 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle P of title II of the act may be cited as the “Job Opportunity Fund Clarification Act of 2006”.